Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2247.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 32, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-3230.03, to read: START_STATUTE32-3230.03. Physicians; patient notification before surgery; self-donation of blood; directed blood donation; definition A. A physician shall notify each patient before the patient has surgery of the patient's option to donate blood for the patient's own use or to have a compatible family member or friend make a directed blood donation for the patient's use.  If the patient would like to make an autologous blood donation or have a directed blood donation made before the surgery, the physician shall contact a blood bank to obtain the proper paperwork and shall complete the paperwork in a timely manner. B. For the purposes of this section, "physician" means a person who is licensed pursuant to chapter 13 or 17 of this title. END_STATUTE